Massachusetts, session 194th, S2492.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 10 of Chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph, and inserting in place thereof, the
following:-
“Two or more adjoining towns, or two or more adjoining municipalities only one of
which is a city, may, in a city by vote of the city council thereof, and in a town by vote of the
selectmen thereof, form a district for the purposes set forth in the first paragraph of this section,
including the appointment and compensation of a director of veterans' services, for the
enforcement therein of such purposes and of such other provisions of law as it may be his duty to
enforce. Any constituent city or town by vote may withdraw from the district at the end of any
fiscal year of such city or town if such withdrawal is voted in the manner aforesaid not less than
of 2

one hundred and eighty days prior to the end of such fiscal year and notice of such vote is filed
with the other municipalities comprising the district.”
of 2